Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-212
Elections; officers of election; vacancies; how filled.

If, on any day appointed for holding any village election, any of the judges or clerks of election shall fail to attend, the electors present may fill such vacancies from among the qualified electors present.

Laws 1879, § 51, p. 205;

R.S.1913, § 5062;

C.S.1922, § 4234;

C.S.1929, § 17-212;

R.S.1943, § 17-212;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 75.